Alabama, session 2026rs, HB164.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Sections 16-54-2, and 16-54-5 of the Code of
Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
"§16-54-2
The University of Montevallo shall be governed by a
board of trustees composed of the Governor, who shall be
president, ex officio, the State Superintendent of Education,
ex officio, and 11 other trustees ( as follows: (i) one from
each congressional district,; (ii) up to one at-large trustee
who is not a resident of this state,; and, (iii) until as
otherwise herein provided, a number of trustees from the
state-at-large sufficient to bring the number to or keep it at
11). Five Six members of the board shall constitute a quorum.
Trustees shall be appointed for a term of 12 years. Beginning
January 1, 2027, trustees shall be appointed for a term of
eight years. No trustee shall serve more than two terms on the
board of trustees. In case of the creation and establishment
of an additional congressional district in the state, the
state-at-large trustee most recently appointed shall cease
Page 2

state-at-large trustee most recently appointed shall cease
HB164 INTRODUCED
automatically to be a trustee from the state-at-large and
become for the remainder of the term trustee for the new
district. Otherwise, all new appointees, except for a
nonresident appointee and the state-at-large appointees, shall
be at the time of their appointment, residents of the district
for which they are appointed, respectively. All appointments
of trustees shall be made by the Governor with the advice and
consent of the Senate. In case of a vacancy in the office of
trustee, the Governor shall appoint a successor, who shall
hold office until the next meeting of the Legislature, when
the Governor, by and with the advice and consent of the
Senate, shall appoint a trustee, who shall hold office for the
unexpired term. A trustee shall be ineligible to be elected by
the board of trustees to or otherwise hold any office of the
institution where compensation is provided. The trustees are
entitled to receive payment of their actual expenses incurred
in the discharge of their duties as trustees."
"§16-54-5
The trustees shall elect a president for a term to be
fixed by them, who shall not be removed during the term for
which he or she is elected, except for just cause, which shall
be explicitly set forth in writing in the minutes of the
proceedings of the trustees and approved by a majority of all
the trustees. No person individual shall be eligible to the
office of president unless he or she is a graduate of some
college or university of well known well-known high standing,
an educator by profession, of good moral character, and
possessing good business and administrative qualifications.
Page 3

possessing good business and administrative qualifications.
HB164 INTRODUCED
The trustees are encouraged to consider an individual who is
an educator by profession for the position of president. The
trustees shall fix the compensation of the president,
including such emoluments and prerequisites necessary to carry
out the functions of the office."
Section 2. This act shall become effective immediately.
Page 4